Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-301
Nebraska Grape and Winery Board; created.

(1) The Nebraska Grape and Winery Board is created. The board shall consist of five members to be appointed by the Governor on a nonpartisan basis. All board members shall be (a) citizens of Nebraska, (b) at least twenty-one years of age, and (c) either engaged in or previously engaged in wine or grape production or research in this state. At least two board members shall be members of the Nebraska Winery and Grape Growers Association. In addition, the Director of Agriculture and the vice chancellor of the University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources or their designees shall be ex officio members of the board but shall have no vote in board matters.

(2) Whenever a vacancy occurs on the board for any reason, the Governor shall appoint an individual to fill such vacancy pursuant to the qualifications set forth in subsection (1) of this section.

Laws 2000, LB 477, § 1.